Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2046.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GORDON PARKS COMMEMORATION.new text end new text begin $800,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center to work in collaboration with Soul Touch Productions to create an art installation and programming to celebrate the incredible life and rich legacy of Gordon Parks. new text end